Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
128E]

HAWAII
EMERGENCY PLANNING AND COMMUNITY

RIGHT-TO-KNOW
ACT

Section

128E-1 Definitions

128E-2 Designation and functions of the Hawaii
state

emergency response commission

128E-3 Powers; rulemaking; appointment of hearing
officers

128E-4 Establishment of emergency planning
districts

128E-5 Establishment and functions of local
emergency

planning committees

128E-6 Reporting requirements

128E-7 Emergency notification requirements

128E-8 Funds for operation

128E-9 Filing fees

128E-10 Immunity from civil liability

128E-11 Penalties and fines

128E-12 Enforcement

128E-13 Relationship to other laws

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next